Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1,100
Attorney General; represent state; duties; powers.

The Attorney General shall represent the state in any suit brought under sections 48-192 to 48-1,109, and is authorized to compromise or settle any such suit, with the approval of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 9;

Laws 1975, LB 187, § 17;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 128.